Connecticut, session 2026, HB05339.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (Effective from passage) The Commissioner of Energy and
Environmental Protection shall conduct a study of municipal permitting
and inspection processes concerning the installation of residential solar
photovoltaic systems. Such study shall include, but need not be limited
to, an examination of the processes and practices of a variety of
municipalities, as selected by the commissioner, to determine the (1)
average time required for permit approvals, and (2) average number of
site inspections required before such system is activated, and (3) local
officials tasked with completing such inspections. Not later than
February 1, 2027, the commissioner shall submit a report, in accordance
with the provisions of section 11-4a of the general statutes, to the joint
standing committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of
matters relating to energy and technology.
LCO No. 2024 1 of 2

Raised Bill No. 5339
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 from passage New section